Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1608.03
Recovery under act; Attorney General; duties.

When the Attorney General, on behalf of a state agency or political subdivision, is authorized to investigate, file suit, or otherwise take action in connection with violations under the Consumer Protection Act, any recovery of damages or costs by judgment, court decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final result shall be subject to the following:

(1) Upon recovery of damages or any monetary payment, except criminal penalties, the costs, expenses, or billings incurred by any state agency or political subdivision in any investigation or other action arising out of a violation under the act shall be sought out in any judgment, court decree, settlement in or out of court, or other final result. Any recovered costs shall be deposited by the Attorney General in the fund from which such costs were expended;

(2) When the Attorney General makes recovery pursuant to the act on behalf of a state agency or political subdivision of any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy, such money, funds, securities, or other things of value shall be deposited by the Attorney General in the fund from which the funds which are being recovered were expended;

(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the State Settlement Cash Fund shall consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments; and

(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, the State Settlement Trust Fund shall consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General, but to include only those funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments.

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 3.